Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

General Provisions

2-14-101. Special elections — When required.

Special elections shall be held when a vacancy in any office is required to be filled by election at other times than those fixed for general elections.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1401.

Cross-References. Vacancy filled without official notice of vacancy, §8-48-108.

Vacancy in office of United States senator or representative in congress, §2-16-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority to call special election to fill vacancy, OAG 97-019 (3/3/97).

2-14-102. Time of holding special election.

Special elections shall be held not less than seventy-five (75) days nor more than eighty (80) days after the officer or body charged with calling the election receives notice of the facts requiring the call. An election for an office shall be held on the same day in every county in which it is held.

If it is necessary to hold a special election to fill a vacant seat in the United States house of representatives, a vacancy in a county office, or a vacancy in any municipal office, and the date for such election, as established under subsection (a), falls within thirty (30) days of an upcoming regular primary or general election being held in that district, the governor, or the county election commission, as specified in § 2-14-103, may issue the writ of election for the special election for the date which will coincide with the regular primary or general election.

If the date of the election is adjusted, as provided in subdivision (b)(1), all other dates dependent on the date of election shall be adjusted accordingly, and any filing of candidacy, or qualifying petitions, financial statements, or other acts shall be timely done if performed in accordance with the revised dates.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1402; Acts 1980, ch. 649, § 2; 1981, ch. 478, § 10.

Cross-References. Time for holding special election to fill vacancy in general assembly, §2-14-202.

2-14-103. Order for special elections.

The governor shall, by writs of election, order special elections for all offices except county and municipal offices for which elections shall be ordered by the county election commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1403.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 2.

2-14-104. Order — Contents and direction.

The order to hold an election for an office shall specify the counties, county or district in which and the day on which the election is to be held, the reason for the election, and the name of the person in whose office the vacancy has occurred.

The order shall be directed to the county election commission or commissions which are to hold the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1404.

2-14-105. Publication of notice.

Within ten (10) days after receipt of an order to hold a special election or notice of facts requiring a special election, the county election commission shall publish, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, a notice of the date and purpose of the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1405.

Cross-References. Newspaper of general circulation defined, §2-1-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 10.

Collateral References.

Statutory provision as to manner and time of notice of special election as mandatory or directory. 119 A.L.R. 661.

2-14-106. Time when qualifying petitions are to be filed.

Candidates for office in a special election shall qualify as required in regular elections but shall file qualifying petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time on the sixth Thursday before the day of the election to have their names printed on the ballots. Party nominations shall be made under §§ 2-5-101(g) and 2-13-204 subject to the deadline in the preceding sentence.

In counties having a population in excess of six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census, when a special election is being held in conjunction with either a municipal, August primary or general election, the time of qualifying for candidates to the office for which the special election is being held shall conform and be governed by the same time and the same date prescribed for the municipal, August primary or general election; but in no way shall the time for qualifying specified by this subsection (b) be less than the qualifying time prescribed for the special election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 84, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1406; Acts 2012, ch. 1101, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Failure to use standard time, §4-1-401.

2-14-107. Special elections to fill vacancy in U.S. house of representatives or general assembly — Requirements and procedures.

If it is necessary to hold a special election to fill a vacant seat in the United States house of representatives or the general assembly, the requirements of §§ 2-1-104 and 2-13-107 shall apply, except the petition must at a minimum bear the signatures of registered voters within the legislative district for which the special election has been called equal to at least two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the total number of votes cast within such legislative district for gubernatorial candidates in the most recent election for governor.

To be recognized as a minor party for purposes of a special primary or general election, a petition as described in subsection (a), must be filed no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the appropriate qualifying deadline for such special primary in the office of the coordinator of elections.

Except as provided in this section, §§ 2-1-104 and 2-13-107 shall govern the process.

Acts 2014, ch. 734, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 734 took effect on April 21, 2014.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 734, § 5. April 21, 2014. [See the Compiler's Notes.]